Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2701.22
Model 2 seller, defined.

Model 2 seller means a seller that has selected a certified automated system to perform part of its sales and use tax functions but retains responsibility for remitting the tax.

Laws 2003, LB 282, § 26.